Wyoming statutes. Title 14 Children
Article 7. Genetic Testing

§ 14-2-701.
Scope of article.

This article governs genetic testing of an individual to determine parentage, whether the individual:

Voluntarily submits to testing; or

Is tested pursuant to an order of the court or a child support enforcement agency.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 14-2-702.
Order for testing.

Except as otherwise provided in this article and article 8 of this act, the court shall order the child and other designated individuals to submit to genetic testing if the request for testing is supported by the sworn statement of a party to the proceeding:

Alleging paternity and stating facts establishing a reasonable probability of the requisite sexual contact between the individuals; or

Denying paternity and stating facts establishing a possibility that sexual contact between the individuals, if any, did not result in the conception of the child.

A child support enforcement agency may order genetic testing only if there is no presumed, acknowledged or adjudicated father.

If a request for genetic testing of a child is made before birth, the court or child support enforcement agency may not order in-utero testing.

If two (2) or more men are subject to court-ordered genetic testing, the testing may be ordered concurrently or sequentially.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

Petition improperly denied.—

District court erred in denying the petition to establish paternity where although it had discretion to determine the timeliness of a paternity petition before ordering testing, the statutes did not afford it discretion on the timeliness of a petition after ordering genetic testing. Specifically, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-2-817

did not afford the court discretion to deny a petition to establish paternity after ordering genetic testing pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-2-702

, the results of which had met the threshold established by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-705(a). TE v. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re AAAE), 2020 WY 117, 471 P.3d 990,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2020).

§ 14-2-703.
Requirements for genetic testing.

Genetic testing shall be of a type reasonably relied upon by experts in the field of genetic testing and performed in a testing laboratory accredited by:

The American Association of Blood Banks, or a successor to its functions;

The American Society for Histocompatibility and Immunogenetics, or a successor to its functions; or

An accrediting body designated by the United States secretary of health and human services.

A specimen used in genetic testing may consist of one (1) or more samples, or a combination of samples, of blood, buccal cells, bone, hair, or other body tissue or fluid. The specimen used in the testing is not required to be of the same kind for each individual undergoing genetic testing.

Based on the ethnic or racial group of an individual, the testing laboratory shall determine the databases from which to select frequencies for use in calculation of the probability of paternity. If there is disagreement as to the testing laboratory’s choice, the following rules apply:

The individual objecting may require the testing laboratory, within thirty (30) days after receipt of the report of the test, to recalculate the probability of paternity using an ethnic or racial group different from that used by the laboratory.

The individual objecting to the testing laboratory’s initial choice shall:

If the frequencies are not available to the testing laboratory for the ethnic or racial group requested, provide the requested frequencies compiled in a manner recognized by accrediting bodies; or

Engage another testing laboratory to perform the calculations.

The testing laboratory may use its own statistical estimate if there is a question regarding which ethnic or racial group is appropriate. If available, the testing laboratory shall calculate the frequencies using statistics for any other ethnic or racial group requested.

If, after recalculation using a different ethnic or racial group, genetic testing does not rebuttably identify a man as the father of a child under W.S.

14-2-605

, an individual who has been tested may be required to submit to additional genetic testing.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

Most of the following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Construction. —

District court did not err by looking to the genetic testing provision in former § 14-2-109 and finding that the mother's husband at the time of the child's birth was the biological father of her child; the district court properly construed the statute in pari materia with other statutes. RWR v. EKB (State ex rel. NDB), 2001 WY 118, 35 P.3d 1224,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 144

(Wyo. 2001).

Genetic testing, upon parties' agreement, not necessary. —

While genetic testing may presumptively be necessary in a paternity action, the presumption can be effectively rebutted by the agreement of the parties. In re Paternity of JRW, 814 P.2d 1256,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 114

(Wyo. 1991).

Conflicting presumptions. —

Presumptive father failed to provide clear and convincing evidence to meet his burden of proving that results of genetic test favoring another man were inaccurate or somehow deficient. TL v. CS, 975 P.2d 1065,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1999).

Cited

in

GDK v. State, 2004 WY 78, 92 P.3d 834,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(2004).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Who may dispute presumption of legitimacy of child conceived or born during wedlock, 90 ALR3d 1032.

Admissibility and weight of blood-grouping tests in disputed paternity cases, 43 ALR4th 579.

Authentication of blood sample taken from human body for purposes other than determining blood alcohol content, 77 ALR5th 201.

§ 14-2-704.
Report of genetic testing.

A report of genetic testing shall be in a record and signed under penalty of perjury by a designee of the testing laboratory. A report made under the requirements of this article is self-authenticating.

Documentation from the testing laboratory of the following information is sufficient to establish a reliable chain of custody that allows the results of genetic testing to be admissible without testimony:

The names and photographs of the individuals whose specimens have been taken;

The names of the individuals who collected the specimens;

The places and dates the specimens were collected;

The names of the individuals who received the specimens in the testing laboratory; and

The dates the specimens were received.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-705.
Genetic testing results; rebuttal.

Under this act, a man is rebuttably identified as the father of a child if the genetic testing complies with this article and the results disclose that:

The man has at least a ninety-nine percent (99%) probability of paternity, using a prior probability of one-half (1/2), as calculated by using the combined paternity index obtained in the testing; and

A combined paternity index of at least one hundred (100) to one (1).

A man identified under subsection (a) of this section as the father of the child may rebut the genetic testing results only by other genetic testing satisfying the requirements of this article which:

Excludes the man as a genetic father of the child; or

Identifies another man as the possible father of the child.

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

14-2-710

, if more than one (1) man is identified by genetic testing as the possible father of the child, the court shall order them to submit to further genetic testing to identify the genetic father.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

Petition improperly denied.—

District court erred in denying the petition to establish paternity where although it had discretion to determine the timeliness of a paternity petition before ordering testing, the statutes did not afford it discretion on the timeliness of a petition after ordering genetic testing. Specifically, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-2-817

did not afford the court discretion to deny a petition to establish paternity after ordering genetic testing pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

14-2-702

, the results of which had met the threshold established by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 14-2-705(a). TE v. Dep't of Family Servs. (In re AAAE), 2020 WY 117, 471 P.3d 990,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(Wyo. 2020).

Expert testimony. —

Even if the district court erred in applying the current version of this section rather than the version that was in effect in 1992 in excluding the testimony of the father's expert disputed two genetic tests determining that he was the child's father, the error was harmless because the father's proffered evidence was insufficient as a matter of law. The first genetic test that determined that the father was not the child's biological father was not simply a problem with the test itself, but rather that samples had been accidentally switched, and those test results were not those of the father, the child, and the child's mother, but rather were the results for three different people; therefore, any expert opinion based on the first test was irrelevant as to whether the father was the child's father.
RK v. State ex rel. Natrona County Child Support Enforcement Dep't, 2008 WY 1, 174 P.3d 166,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 2008).

Trial court did not commit plain error by admitting the State's expert's testimony regarding Wyoming's statutory paternity presumption where it was admitted to support uncharged misconduct under Wyo. R. Evid. 404(b) and there was no indication that the State relied on the evidence to shift its burden of proof to defendant. The expert testified regarding the presumption only to give context to the laboratory process, she testified that DNA testing showed that defendant was the father of the child victim's baby, three other witnesses testified that defendant was the baby's father, and the victim testified that defendant sexually assaulted her on five different occasions. Snyder v. State, 2015 WY 91, 353 P.3d 693,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 103

(Wyo. 2015).

§ 14-2-706.
Costs of genetic testing.

Subject to assessment of costs under article 7 of this act, the cost of initial genetic testing shall be advanced:

By a child support enforcement agency in a proceeding in which the agency is providing services;

By the individual who made the request;

As agreed by the parties; or

As ordered by the court.

In cases in which the cost is advanced by the child support enforcement agency, the agency may seek reimbursement from a man who is rebuttably identified as the father.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 14-2-402(a)(xxi).

Editor's notes. —

The following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Awards found proper. —

Where mother admitted at hearing that she never really doubted father's paternity, but she had denied paternity from date of father's original petition, she was properly ordered to pay part of father's attorney's fees and genetic testing costs. KC v. KJM (In re IC), 971 P.2d 603,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1999).

An award of costs was proper where presumptive father improperly continued to contest paternity, and did not prevail on remand after summary judgment in his favor was reversed. TL v. CS, 975 P.2d 1065,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 1999).

Government agencies may pay cost. —

The Wyoming Parentage Act contemplates department of family services (DFS) will be a party to some actions under this title. An agency cannot bring an action and then claim it is not a party; since DFS is a party, this section authorizes an award of attorney fees. Department of Family Servs., Div. of Pub. Assistance & Social Servs. v. DDM, 877 P.2d 259,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 81

(Wyo. 1994).

Incurred costs must be reasonable. —

The discretion afforded to the trial court with respect to the assessment of costs is not absolute. It must be exercised in accordance with the rule that costs which are awarded to a litigant are limited in amount to those which the evidence shows actually have been incurred and shows to be reasonable. In re SAJ, 781 P.2d 528,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 216

(Wyo. 1989), (decided under prior law).

No abuse of discretion in court's denial of attorney fees.—

See LC v. TL, 870 P.2d 374,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 513 U.S. 871, 115 S. Ct. 195, 130 L. Ed. 2d 127, 1994 U.S. LEXIS 6327 (U.S. 1994).

§ 14-2-707.
Additional genetic testing.

The court or the child support enforcement agency shall order additional genetic testing upon the request of a party who contests the result of the original testing. If the previous genetic testing identified a man as the father of the child under W.S.

14-2-705

, the court or agency may not order additional testing unless the party provides advance payment for the testing.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-708.
Deceased individual.

For good cause shown, the court may order genetic testing of a deceased individual.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-709.
Identical brothers.

The court may order genetic testing of a brother of a man identified as the father of a child if the man is commonly believed to have an identical brother and evidence suggests that the brother may be the genetic father of the child.

If each brother satisfies the requirements as the identified father of the child under W.S.

14-2-705

without consideration of another identical brother being identified as the father of the child, the court may rely on nongenetic evidence to adjudicate which brother is the father of the child.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.

§ 14-2-710.
Confidentiality of genetic testing.

In all cases where paternity testing is undertaken, all genetic information, including genetic material and test results, shall be maintained only as long as an accreditation body specified in W.S.

14-2-703

requires such materials to be maintained for accreditation purposes. Thereafter, all materials shall be destroyed or returned to the individual from whom the information was obtained.

No testing shall be conducted on any identifiable genetic material for purposes other than paternity determination without the written consent of the individual from whom the genetic material is obtained.

All information obtained from identifiable genetic material submitted or used for determination of paternity shall be confidential and used solely for the purposes of determining paternity, unless individual identifiers are removed from the data used for purposes other than establishing paternity.

For purposes of this section, “genetic information” means any information about genes, gene products or inherited characteristics that may derive from the individual or a family member, including, but not limited to, information:

Regarding carrier status;

Regarding an increased likelihood of future disease or increased sensitivity to any substance;

Derived from laboratory tests that identify mutations in specific genes or chromosomes, physical medical examinations, family histories, requests for genetic services or counseling, tests of gene products and direct analysis of genes or chromosomes.

Release of any information obtained in paternity testing without the written consent of the individual from whom the genetic material is obtained to anyone not directly involved in the paternity determination shall be a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punishable by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both fine and imprisonment.

An individual who intentionally releases an identifiable specimen of another individual for any purpose other than that relevant to the proceeding regarding parentage without a court order or the written permission of the individual who furnished the specimen commits a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or both fine and imprisonment.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 93, § 1.